California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(a) If a public entity owes money to the judgment debtor, the obligation of the public entity may be applied to the satisfaction of the money judgment against the judgment debtor only in the manner provided by (1) this article, (2) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) (wage garnishment), or (3) Article 5 (commencing with Section 708.410) (lien in pending action or proceeding).

(b) The earnings of a public officer or employee shall not be withheld pursuant to this article. Except as expressly provided by law, the earnings of a public officer or employee may
 be withheld for the payment of a money judgment only pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010).

(c) If the obligation of a public entity to pay money to the judgment debtor is the subject of a pending action or special proceeding, the procedure in this article does not apply. The payment of the obligation that is the subject of the pending action or special proceeding may be applied to the satisfaction of the money judgment against the judgment debtor only in the manner provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 708.410).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.730.

(a) If money is owing and unpaid to the judgment debtor by a public entity, the judgment creditor may file, in the manner provided in this article, an abstract of the money judgment or a certified copy of the money judgment, together with an affidavit that states that the judgment creditor desires the relief provided by this article and states the exact amount then required to satisfy the judgment. The judgment creditor may state in the affidavit any fact tending to establish the identity of the judgment debtor.

(b) Promptly after filing the abstract or certified copy of the judgment and the affidavit with the public entity, the judgment creditor shall serve notice of the filing on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(c) If the judgment is for support and related costs and money is owing and unpaid to the judgment debtor by a state agency, including, but not limited to, money owing and unpaid to the judgment debtor by a state agency on a claim for refund from the Franchise Tax Board under the Personal Income Tax Law, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or the Bank and Corporation Tax Law, Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or as a result of the judgment debtor’s winnings in the California State Lottery, and the local child support agency is enforcing the
 support obligation pursuant to Section 17400 of the Family Code, the claim may be submitted as follows: The local child support agency may file the affidavit referred to in subdivision (a) without filing an abstract or certified copy of the judgment. In lieu thereof, the affidavit shall also state that an abstract of the judgment could be obtained. Where there is more than one judgment debtor, the local child support agency may include all the judgment debtors in a single affidavit. Separate affidavits need not be submitted for each judgment debtor. The affidavit need not on its face separately identify each judgment debtor or the exact amount required to satisfy the judgment, so long as it incorporates by reference forms or other automated data transmittals, as required by the Department of Child Support Services, which contain this information. Affidavits submitted pursuant to this subdivision by the local child support agency shall meet the standards and procedures prescribed by the state agency to which
 the affidavit is submitted, except that those affidavits submitted with respect to moneys owed and unpaid to the judgment debtor as a result of a claim for refund from the Franchise Tax Board under the Personal Income Tax Law, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or the Bank and Corporation Tax Law, Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall meet the standards and procedures prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

In serving the notice required by subdivision (b), the Director of the Department of Child Support Services or his or her designee may act in lieu of the judgment creditor as to judgments enforced under this division.

(d) If the judgment is for child, spousal, or family support and related costs and money is owing and unpaid to the judgment debtor by a state agency on a claim for refund from
 the Franchise Tax Board under the Personal Income Tax Law, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or the Bank and Corporation Tax Law, Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or as a result of the judgment debtor’s winnings in the California State Lottery, the judgment creditor may file with the court an abstract or a certified copy of the judgment ordering the payment of child, spousal, or family support, together with a request that the court issue a Notice of Support Arrearage, as provided in Section 708.780, to which any personal income tax refunds and lottery winnings owed the judgment debtor by the State of California will be subject. The request shall be accompanied by an affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, which shall state that the judgment creditor desires the relief provided by this subdivision and shall state the exact amount then required to satisfy the judgment. In addition, the affidavit
 shall specify the beginning and ending dates of all periods during which the arrearage for support occurred, specify the arrearage for each month, and state that the support is at least 90 days overdue or is overdue in an amount equal to 90 days of support. It shall also certify that the child or children are not recipients, and during the period for which payment is requested, were not recipients, of Aid to Families with Dependent Children and there was no assignment to a state or county agency of support and shall certify on information and belief that there is not current or past action by a district attorney pending for support or support enforcement on the judgment creditor’s behalf.

The request shall have attached a proof of service showing that copies of the request, the affidavit, and the abstract or certified copy of the judgment ordering the payment of support have been served on the judgment debtor and the district attorney of the county in which the
 support judgment is entered. Service shall be by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the party to be served, or by personal service.

This subdivision does not apply in any instance in which a district attorney initiated or participated as counsel in the action for support or if support is required to be paid through a district attorney’s office.

The Department of Child Support Services shall, upon request, inform the Legislature of the use and effect of this subdivision on or before December 31, 2000.

This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 1996, and shall become inoperative on December 31, 2000.

(e) For purposes of this section, “support” means an obligation owing on behalf of a child, spouse, or family, or combination thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 18.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

708.740.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), if money is owing and unpaid to the judgment debtor by a state agency, the judgment creditor shall file the abstract or certified copy of the judgment and the affidavit with the state agency owing the money to the judgment debtor prior to the time the state agency presents the claim of the judgment debtor to the Controller. Where the affidavit is prepared under subdivision (c) of Section 708.730, the affidavit shall be filed with the Department of Child Support Services, and no abstract
 need be filed. Filing of the affidavit with the department shall be sufficient to require the Controller to transfer the funds claimed by the judgment debtor, notwithstanding that the claim of the judgment debtor has been filed with another state agency.

(b) When presenting the claim of the judgment debtor to the Controller, the state agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Note the fact of the filing of the abstract or certified copy of the judgment and the affidavit.

(2) State the amount required to satisfy the judgment as shown by the affidavit.

(3) State any amounts advanced to the judgment debtor by the state, or owed by the judgment debtor to the state, for expenses or for any other purpose.

(c) Except as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), to discharge the claim of the judgment debtor, the Controller shall (1) deposit with the court, by a warrant or check payable to the court, the amount due the judgment debtor (after deducting an amount sufficient to reimburse the state for any amounts advanced to the judgment debtor or owed by the judgment debtor to the state) required to satisfy the money judgment as shown by the affidavit in full or to the greatest extent and (2) pay the balance thereof, if any, to the judgment debtor.

(d) Where an affidavit stating the existence of a judgment for support has been submitted to the Department of Child Support Services, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 708.730, to discharge the claim of a judgment debtor, the Controller shall direct payment to the county agency designated by the local child support agency in his or her affidavit.

(e) Where the judgment is for support and the money owed is for lottery winnings or a refund of overpayment of tax, penalty, interest, or interest allowable with respect to an overpayment under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the support obligation is not being enforced pursuant to Section 17400 of the Family Code, the judgment creditor may file the abstract or certified copy of the judgment with the local child support agency of the county in which the support judgment is entered or registered. The local child support agency shall then file the claim of the judgment creditor pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 708.730. When funds are received by the local child support agency, it shall discharge any claim of the judgment debtor by forwarding those sums to the clerk of the court pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section. Any and all notices otherwise required of a judgment creditor or
 the clerk of the court, and any litigation to enforce rights under this subdivision shall be the responsibility of the judgment creditor, the same as if service had been directly on the Controller without the intervention of the local child support agency.

(f) Where the claim of the judgment debtor is less than ten dollars ($10) and the claim of the judgment creditor arises under an affidavit filed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 708.730, the Controller may disregard the claim of the judgment creditor and forward any and all sums due to the judgment debtor. In the event that there is more than one claimant for a refund, the Franchise Tax Board shall have discretion in allocating the overpayment among claimants.

(g) Should two or more local child support agencies submit claims on behalf of a judgment creditor, the Controller in his or her discretion may select which claim or
 claims he or she shall honor.

(h) Any claims which are honored in behalf of a judgment creditor shall be considered as refunds of tax overpayments to the judgment debtor.

(i) For purposes of this section, “support” means an obligation owing on behalf of a child, spouse, or family, or combination thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 19.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

708.750.

If money is owing and unpaid to the judgment debtor by a public entity other than a state agency, the judgment creditor shall file the abstract or certified copy of the judgment and the affidavit with the auditor of the public entity or, if there is no auditor, with the official whose duty corresponds to that of auditor. To discharge the claim of the judgment debtor, the auditor or other official shall (1) deposit with the court by a warrant or check payable to the court, the amount due the judgment debtor (after deducting an amount sufficient to reimburse the public entity for any amounts advanced to the judgment debtor or owed by the judgment
 debtor to the public entity) required to satisfy the money judgment as shown by the affidavit in full or to the greatest extent and (2) pay the balance thereof, if any, to the judgment debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.755.

(a) Upon compliance with this section, the lien of a judgment creditor pursuant to this article is created against a lottery prize to be paid in annual installments and shall continue in force and effect until the judgment is paid or expires, whichever occurs first. For the lien to continue in effect, the judgment creditor shall do all of the following:

(1) Commencing with the second installment against which the judgment lien creditor asserts its lien,
 annually file with the lottery an affidavit stating that the judgment has not been satisfied and the amount of the remaining unsatisfied judgment, including interest and costs, if any. This affidavit shall be filed with the lottery not less than 45 days, nor more than 90 days, before the annual payment due date on the prize that is the subject of the judgment lien.

(2) If the judgment lien is renewed, file with the lottery a certified copy of the renewal application, as authorized in this code not less than 45 days, nor more than 90 days, before the annual payment due date on the prize that is the subject of the judgment lien, in order for the judgment lien to be effective in continuing the existing judgment lien against the annual lottery prize payments.

(b) If the judgment lien creditor fails to file the annual statement, renewal of judgment, or renewal of abstract, the lien
 shall expire. Expiration of a lien for failure to comply with this section shall not preclude the judgment creditor from commencing a new procedure under this article to enforce the judgment, to the extent that the judgment otherwise continues to be enforceable under applicable law.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 708.750 (as added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 363) by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

708.760.

(a) If the judgment debtor named in the abstract or certified copy of the judgment filed pursuant to this article is a contractor upon a public work, the cost of which is to be paid out of public moneys voted, appropriated, or otherwise set apart for such purpose, only so much of the contract price shall be deemed owing and unpaid within the meaning of Section 708.740 or
 708.750 as may remain payable under the terms of the contractor’s contract, upon the completion thereof, after deducting sums due and to become due to persons described in Section 9100 of the Civil Code. In ascertaining the sums due or to become due to such persons, only claims which are filed against the moneys due or to become due to the judgment debtor in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9350) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code shall be considered.

(b) The Controller, auditor, or other public disbursing officer whose duty it is to make payments under the provisions of the contract may not deposit an amount with the court pursuant to this article until the contract is completed, but may deposit an amount with the court to satisfy the claim of the judgment debtor before the payments specified in subdivision (a) are made so long as a sufficient amount is retained for the satisfaction of the claims of persons
 described in Section 9100 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 23.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

708.770.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (g), promptly after deposit with the court by the public entity, the court clerk shall cause a notice of deposit to be served on the judgment debtor. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(b) Within 10 days after service of the notice of deposit pursuant to subdivision (a), the judgment debtor who claims an exemption shall do both of the following:

(1) File with the court a claim of exemption and a notice of motion for an order determining the claim of
 exemption. The claim of exemption shall include all of the matters set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 703.520.

(2) Serve on the judgment creditor a copy of the notice of motion, a copy of the claim of exemption, and a notice of hearing on the motion. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(c) The hearing on the motion shall be held not later than 30 days from the date the notice of motion was filed with the court unless continued by the court for good cause.

(d) Within 10 days after the judgment creditor is served under subdivision (b), the judgment creditor who opposes the motion shall do both of the following: 

(1) File with the court a notice of opposition to the claim of exemption. The notice of opposition to the claim of exemption shall
 be executed under oath and shall include all of the matters set forth in Section 703.560.

(2) Serve on the judgment debtor a copy of the notice of opposition to the claim of exemption. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(e) Subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 703.580 and Sections 703.590 and 703.600 apply to a claim of exemption made pursuant to this section.

(f) The failure of the judgment debtor to make a claim of exemption under this section constitutes a waiver of the exemption.

(g) In lieu of service of the notice of deposit described herein, where a state agency has been served with an affidavit pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 708.730 and has presented the claim of the judgment creditor to the Controller pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 708.740, the state agency shall cause a notice of deposit to be sent to the judgment debtor instructing the judgment debtor to file any and all requests for relief with the district attorney who filed the affidavit, or the court clerk if the seizure arises under subdivision (e) of Section 708.740. Except in those cases arising under subdivision (e) of Section 708.740, the judgment debtor shall file the request for relief with the district attorney within 15 days after service of notice from the public agency, or the judgment debtor shall be deemed to have waived any claim he or she might otherwise have. If the matter cannot be resolved with the district attorney, the district attorney shall so advise the judgment debtor and the judgment debtor shall then be authorized to commence proceedings under this section or any other appropriate provision of law. The notice from the district attorney shall for any limitation have the same effect as a notice of deposit under subdivision (a).
 Service of any notice or request under this subdivision shall be made personally or by mail.

Claims arising from the filing of an abstract or certified copy of a judgment, under subdivision (e) of Section 708.740 shall be governed by the procedure and limitations set forth in subdivisions (a) through (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1010, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

708.775.

After the expiration of the period allowed for claiming an exemption under Section 708.770 if no exemption has been claimed, or after the determination of the claim of exemption if an exemption is claimed within the period allowed for claiming the exemption under Section 708.770, the court shall pay the nonexempt portion of the money deposited to which the judgment creditor is entitled to the judgment creditor and the balance thereof, if any, to the judgment debtor, unless some other disposition is required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.780.

(a) Filing of the abstract or certified copy of the judgment and the affidavit pursuant to this article creates a lien on the money owing and unpaid to the judgment debtor by the public entity in an amount equal to that which may properly be applied to the satisfaction of the money judgment under this article.

(b) When an affidavit is filed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 708.730, it shall apply to all claims for refund from the Franchise Tax Board under the
 Personal Income Tax Law, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or the Bank and Corporation Tax Law, Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, which the judgment debtor subsequently claims during a period one year after filing of the affidavit, or October 1 of the year following the filing of the affidavit, whichever occurs later, the same as if claims for these overpayments were filed by the judgment debtor with the appropriate state agency on the date the affidavit was filed.

(c) When a request is filed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 708.730 with the court, the clerk of the court shall issue a Notice of Support Arrearage. The clerk of the court shall issue the notice 30 days after the request was filed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 708.730 without a hearing if no objection has been raised by the judgment debtor pursuant to this
 subdivision. If an objection has been raised, the notice shall not be ordered until after a hearing. The notice shall contain the name of the person ordered to pay support and his or her social security number; the amount of the arrearage determined by the court; whether the arrearage is for child, spousal, or family support and the specific combination thereof; a statement of how the recipient may challenge the statement of arrearage; and the name, address, and social security number of the person to whom the arrearage is owed. Upon the clerk of the court issuing the Notice of Support Arrearage, a copy of the request, the affidavit, and the notice shall be served by the party who requested the court to issue the Notice of Support Arrearage upon the person ordered to pay support and the Controller. Service may be personal, in accordance with Section 1011, or by mail, in accordance with Section 1013. Service upon the Controller shall be at the Controller’s office in Sacramento.

The judgment debtor may object to the request or affidavit upon any of the following grounds: (1) there is an error in the amount of the arrearage stated in the affidavit; (2) the alleged judgment debtor is not the judgment debtor from whom the support is due; (3) the amount to be intercepted exceeds that allowable under federal law; (4) a default in payment of the support for 30 days has not occurred; or (5) other necessary factual allegations contained in the affidavit are erroneous.

Upon receipt of the Notice of Support Arrearage, the Controller shall take reasonable measures to deduct from any personal income tax refunds and lottery winnings owed and processed for payment to the judgment debtor and deposit with the court a warrant, subject to Sections 708.770 and 708.775, with service of a copy of the warrant upon the local child support agency of the county in which the support judgment is entered, payable to the court,
 the amount due the judgment creditor (after deducting an amount sufficient to reimburse the state for any amounts advanced to the judgment debtor or owed by the judgment debtor to the state) required to satisfy the money judgment as shown by the affidavit in full or to the greatest extent, and pay the balance thereof, if any, to the judgment debtor. At any hearing pursuant to Section 708.770, the judgment debtor may challenge the distribution of these funds on exemption or other grounds, including, but not limited to, an allegation that the judgment has been satisfied or that service was improper. The notice shall not apply to any money which is exempt by law from execution. The Controller shall determine the cost of enforcing the notice and may establish a notice filing fee not to exceed five dollars ($5).

Service of the Notice of Support Arrearage and of the request and affidavit pursuant to this subdivision creates a lien on the money owing and unpaid to the
 judgment debtor which shall become effective 30 days following service upon the Controller. This notice shall remain in effect for four years from the date of its issuance or until the arrearage for which the notice was issued is satisfied, whichever occurs first.

Any person who files a request with the court to issue a Notice of Support Arrearage pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 708.730 shall notify the court and the Controller of any satisfaction of the arrearage after the Notice of Support Arrearage has been issued by the clerk of the court. The notice to the court and the Controller shall be filed with the court and the Controller and served upon the local child support agency of the county in which the support judgment is entered within 30 days of the satisfaction or discharge and shall show a partial or full satisfaction of the arrearage or any other resolution of the arrearage.

Upon filing and service, the
 Notice of Support Arrearage shall be of no force and effect.

The State Department of Social Services shall, upon request, inform the Legislature of the use and effect of this subdivision on or before December 31, 2001.

This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 1996, and shall become inoperative on December 31, 2001.

(d) For purposes of this section, “support” means an obligation owing on behalf of a child, spouse, or family, or combination thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 652, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

708.785.

(a) The judgment creditor upon filing the abstract or certified copy of the judgment and the affidavit shall pay a fee of six dollars ($6) to the public entity with which it is filed.

(b) Fees received by the state under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the fund from which payments were, or would be, made on account of collection under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.790.

No public officer or employee is liable for failure to perform a duty imposed by this article unless sufficient information is furnished by the abstract or certified copy of the judgment together with the affidavit to enable the officer or employee in the exercise of reasonable diligence to ascertain the identity of the judgment debtor therefrom and from the papers and records on file in the office in which the officer or employee works. The word “office” as used in this section does not include any branch or subordinate office located in a different city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.795.

Except as to sums due and unpaid under a judgment for support, nothing in this article authorizes the filing against an overpayment of tax, penalty, or interest, or interest allowable with respect to an overpayment, under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1007, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Enforcement Against Franchise [708.910. - 708.930.]

708.910.

As used in this article, “franchise” means a franchise granted by a public entity and all the rights and privileges thereof, other than the franchise of being a corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.920.

(a) The court may, in its discretion, order a franchise applied to the satisfaction of a money judgment upon application by the judgment creditor made on noticed motion. The notice of motion shall be served on the judgment debtor and the public entity that granted the franchise. Service shall be made personally or by mail. In exercising its discretion, the court shall determine whether application of the franchise to the satisfaction of the judgment is proper taking into account all the circumstances of the case, including but not limited to the nature of the franchise, whether the franchise is by its terms transferable, and
 the likelihood that application of the franchise to the satisfaction of the judgment will yield a substantial amount.

(b) If the court orders application of the franchise to the satisfaction of the judgment, application shall be by such means as appears proper to the court, including but not limited to sale of the franchise, assignment of the franchise or proceeds of the franchise, or appointment of a receiver. The court may include in its order, or make additional orders containing, provisions to effectuate the application of the franchise to the satisfaction of the judgment, including but not limited to provisions relating to the place of sale of the franchise, possession of the property of the judgment debtor necessary for the exercise of the franchise, receipt of proceeds of the franchise, recovery of penalties imposed by law and recoverable for injury to the franchise or for damages or other cause, and the judgment debtor’s powers, duties,
 and liability for penalties and forfeitures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

708.930.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, an order for application of a franchise to the satisfaction of a money judgment is subject to all applicable laws governing sale, transfer, or other actions concerning the franchise, including but not limited to any necessary approvals by the Public Utilities Commission or local public entities and compliance with statutory or administrative regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Other Enforcement Procedures [709.010. - 709.030.]

709.010.

(a) As used in this section, “trust” has the meaning provided in Section 82 of the Probate Code.

(b) The judgment debtor’s interest as a beneficiary of a trust is subject to enforcement of a money judgment only upon petition under this section by a judgment creditor to a court having jurisdiction over administration of the trust as prescribed in Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 9 of the Probate Code. The judgment debtor’s interest in the trust may be applied to the satisfaction of the money judgment by such means as the court, in its
 discretion, determines are proper, including but not limited to imposition of a lien on or sale of the judgment debtor’s interest, collection of trust income, and liquidation and transfer of trust property by the trustee.

(c) Nothing in this section affects the limitations on the enforcement of a money judgment against the judgment debtor’s interest in a trust under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15300) of Part 2 of Division 9 of the Probate Code, and the provisions of this section are subject to the limitations of that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 820, Sec. 18.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 43 of Ch. 820.)
-------------------------------------------

709.020.

The judgment creditor may apply to the court on noticed motion for an order applying to the satisfaction of a money judgment a contingent remainder, executory interest, or other interest of the judgment debtor in property that is not vested in the judgment debtor. The interest of the judgment debtor may be applied to the satisfaction of the money judgment by such means as the court, in its discretion, determines are proper to protect the interests of both the judgment debtor and judgment creditor, including but not limited to the imposition of a lien on or the sale of the judgment debtor’s interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

709.030.

Property in a guardianship or conservatorship estate is not subject to enforcement of a money judgment by a procedure provided in this division, but the judgment creditor may apply to the court in which the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending under Division 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of the Probate Code for an order requiring payment of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 3. ENFORCEMENT OF NONMONEY JUDGMENTS [712.010. - 717.010.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [712.010. - 712.070.]

712.010.

After entry of a judgment for possession or sale of property, a writ of possession or sale shall be issued by the clerk of the court upon application of the judgment creditor and shall be directed to the levying officer in the county where the judgment is to be enforced. The application shall include a declaration under penalty of perjury stating the daily rental value of the property as of the date the complaint for unlawful detainer was filed. A separate writ shall be issued for each county where the judgment is to be enforced. Writs may be issued successively until the judgment is satisfied, except that a new writ may not be issued for a county
until the expiration of 180 days after the issuance of a prior writ for that county unless the prior writ is first returned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1405, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

712.020.

A writ of possession or sale issued pursuant to this division shall require the levying officer to whom it is directed to enforce the judgment and shall include the following information:

(a) The date of issuance of the writ.

(b) The title of the court where the judgment for possession or sale
is entered and the cause and number of the action.

(c) The name and address of the creditor and the name and last known address of the judgment debtor. If the judgment debtor is other than a natural person, the type of legal entity shall be stated.

(d) The date the judgment was entered, and the date of any subsequent renewals, and where entered in the records of the court.

(e) If the judgment for possession or sale includes a money judgment, the amount required to satisfy the money judgment on the date the writ is issued, and the amount of interest accruing daily on the principal amount of the judgment from the date the writ is issued may be included on the writ at the option of the creditor.

(f) Whether any person has requested notice of sale under the
judgment and, if so, the name and address of that person.

(g) Any other information required to be included in the particular writ.

(h) A statement indicating whether the case is limited or unlimited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 680, Sec. 14.   (AB 2394)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

712.030.

(a) Upon delivery of the writ of possession or sale to the levying officer to whom the writ is directed, together with the written instructions of the judgment creditor, the levying officer shall execute the writ in the manner prescribed by law.

(b) The levying officer may not levy upon or otherwise seize property under the writ after the expiration of 180 days from the date the writ was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

712.040.

(a) A writ of possession or sale may be enforced as a writ of execution to satisfy any money judgment included in the judgment for possession or sale. If amounts due under the judgment are not satisfied pursuant to the writ of possession or sale, the judgment creditor may use a writ of execution to satisfy any money judgment included in the judgment after the writ of possession or sale has been returned or 180 days after its issuance, whichever is earlier. If the judgment creditor does not desire issuance of a writ of possession or sale (because possession has been voluntarily surrendered, the secured obligation has been
voluntarily satisfied, or other reason), a writ of execution may be issued to satisfy any money judgment included in the judgment.

(b) Whether or not a writ of possession or sale has been issued, enforced, or returned, the judgment creditor may use any available remedies provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 708. 010) of Division 2 to satisfy any money judgment included in the judgment.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if so ordered in a judgment for sale, a money judgment included in the judgment may only be enforced as ordered by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

712.050.

The return of a writ of possession or sale is governed by Section 699.560 (return of writ of execution).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

712.060.

The court may appoint a receiver pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 708.610) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 to enforce a judgment for possession or sale of property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

712.070.

Except as provided in Section 695.050, a judgment against a public entity is enforceable under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Judgment for Possession of Personal Property [714.010. - 714.030.]

714.010.

(a) A judgment for possession of personal property may be enforced by a writ of possession of personal property issued pursuant to Section 712.010. 

(b) In addition to the information required by Section 712.020, the writ of possession of personal property shall contain the following:

(1) A description of the property to be delivered to the judgment creditor in satisfaction of the judgment.

(2) The value of the property if specified in
the judgment or a supplemental order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

714.020.
